Tennessee, session 114, HB0696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Statewide Sexual Assault
Response Team (SART) Coordinator Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 1, Part 9, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
38-1-904. Statewide SART coordinator.
(a) There is created a statewide sexual assault response team (SART)
coordinator.
(b) The statewide SART coordinator is responsible for ensuring the proper
training, compliance, and effective functioning of local SARTs in accordance with this
part. The statewide SART coordinator shall provide statewide leadership, coordination,
technical assistance, and oversight to ensure the proper functioning of sexual assault
response teams, including training, compliance with applicable laws, and access to
necessary resources.
(c) The statewide SART coordinator is an employee of the Tennessee Coalition
to End Domestic and Sexual Violence and shall report directly to the executive director
of the organization.
(d) Subject to appropriations, the statewide SART coordinator position is funded
by grants from the department of finance and administration, office of criminal justice
HB0696
002824
- 1 -

programs, to the Tennessee Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence for such
purpose.
(e) Not later than February 1 annually, the statewide SART coordinator shall
submit a report to the chief clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and the
legislative librarian on the status of the SART program throughout the state, including
training efforts, compliance levels, and recommendations for improvement. The
coordinator shall also report on the effectiveness of SARTs in responding to sexual
assault cases, identifying gaps in service, and addressing systemic challenges.
SECTION 3. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002824